Hawaii, session 2026, SB2232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  There is established a three-year tiny home grant pilot program within the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation to provide financial support for tiny home villages as a housing solution. (b) The Hawaii housing finance and development corporation shall award grants to a county or qualified nonprofit organization that builds sustainable tiny home villages with shared community resources; provided that the corporation shall prioritize projects that provide housing for kupuna, low-income families, native Hawaiian beneficiaries, and individuals experiencing homelessness. (c) To be eligible for a grant, a tiny home village shall include: (1)  Private sleeping units between one hundred twenty and four hundred square feet; (2)  Shared kitchens, bathrooms, and laundry facilities; (3)  Community spaces and gardens; and (4)  Renewable energy features, including solar energy and rainwater catchment systems. A tiny home village shall be exclusively for residential use and shall not be used for transient accommodations, second homes, or any other accessory use other than as a primary residence. (d) A county or nonprofit organization that is awarded a grant to build a tiny home village shall submit an annual report to the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation on village outcomes, detailing occupancy rates, costs, and resident well-being. (e) The Hawaii housing finance and development corporation may seek matching funds from local nonprofit organizations and private partners. (f)  The Hawaii housing finance and development corporation shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2030.  The report shall include: (1)  A statewide evaluation of the tiny home grant pilot program; and (2)  Recommendations on whether the tiny home grant pilot program should be expanded. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be allocated as follows: (1)  $ for the tiny home grant pilot program; and (2)  $170,000 to establish one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) housing development specialist II position, including benefits. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.